Indiana, session 2026, SB161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-30.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2011,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "scholarship
granting organization" refers to:
(1) an organization that:
(1) (A) is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) (B) conducts a school scholarship program without limiting
the availability of scholarships to students of only one (1)
participating school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-6); or
(2) an organization that:
(A) meets the requirements described in subdivision (1);
and
(B) is included on the list submitted to the Secretary of the
Treasury of the United States for the taxable year under
IC 20-53-1.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.1-30.5-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.182-2009(ss),
SB 161—LS 6719/DI 143


SECTION 205, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) To apply a credit
against the taxpayer's state tax liability, a taxpayer must claim the credit
on the taxpayer's annual state tax return or returns in the manner
prescribed by the department. The taxpayer shall submit to the
department the information that the department determines is necessary
for the department to determine whether the taxpayer is eligible for the
credit.
(b) To the extent a taxpayer claims the credit under this chapter
for qualified contributions (as defined in Section 25F(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code) to a scholarship granting organization that
is on the list of qualified scholarship granting organizations under
IC 20-53-1 for the taxable year, the taxpayer must identify the
following on the taxpayer's annual state tax return for such
qualified contributions:
(1) Each scholarship granting organization to which a
qualified contribution was made.
(2) The total amount of the taxpayer's qualified contributions
for the taxable year.
(3) The amount of the credit claimed for those qualified
contributions under this chapter for the taxable year.
The department may prescribe any forms necessary for purposes
of this subsection. The department's state tax return instruction
shall include notice to a taxpayer that a credit amount identified in
this subsection that is claimed under this chapter may
correspondingly reduce the taxpayer's allowable federal tax credit
under Section 25F(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 3. IC 20-53 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
ARTICLE 53. STATE PARTICIPATION IN FEDERAL TAX
CREDIT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
Chapter 1. State List of Scholarship Granting Organizations
Sec. 1. The department is authorized to and shall as early as
practicable elect to participate as a covered state in the federal tax
credit scholarship program for elementary and secondary
education under Section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 2. (a) The department shall identify qualified scholarship
granting organizations located in Indiana that meet the
requirements set forth in section 4 of this chapter.
(b) The department shall accept applications throughout the
year from scholarship granting organizations wishing to be
SB 161—LS 6719/DI 143


identified as a qualified scholarship granting organization under
subsection (a).
Sec. 3. (a) Not later than the first day of January each year, the
department shall submit to the Secretary of the Treasury of the
United States the list of qualified scholarship granting
organizations identified under section 2(a) of this chapter that are
located in Indiana and publish the list submitted under this
subsection on its website.
(b) The department shall on each list submitted under
subsection (a) certify its authority to do so as required under
Section 25F(g)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 4. (a) A scholarship granting organization shall be included
on the list of qualified scholarship granting organizations
submitted by the department to the Secretary of the Treasury of
the United States under this chapter, if the organization:
(1) is a nonprofit organization with the primary purpose of
providing scholarships to students; and
(2) meets the requirements described in Section 25F(c)(5) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) A scholarship granting organization (as defined in
IC 6-3.1-30.5-3(1)) for purposes of the tax credit under
IC 6-3.1-30.5 is eligible to be included on the list of qualified
scholarship granting organizations under this chapter, if the
scholarship granting organization meets the requirements under
subsection (a). Each year the department shall provide to the
department of state revenue a list of the scholarship granting
organizations (as defined in IC 6-3.1-30.5-3(1)) that are also
included on the list of qualified scholarship granting organizations
submitted by the department to the Secretary of the Treasury of
the United States under this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 22-4.1-4-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) As used in this section, "High skill, high wage,
or in demand industry sectors or occupations" means sectors or
occupations identified by the state pursuant to the Carl D. Perkins
Career and Technical Education Act of 2006 (20 U.S.C. 2301 et
seq.) and applicable state and local workforce development
processes.
(b) The governor and the department, in consultation with the
commission for higher education (established under IC 21-18-2-1)
shall do the following:
(1) Establish a process to identify eligible workforce training
SB 161—LS 6719/DI 143


programs that prepare students for high skill, high wage, or
in demand industry sectors or occupations for workforce Pell
grants.
(2) Establish a process for institutions and programs to:
(A) apply for recognition as an eligible workforce training
program;
(B) be approved for workforce Pell grants; and
(C) appeal denials of workforce Pell grants.
(3) Coordinate certification and oversight of eligible
workforce training programs with:
(A) workforce focused agencies;
(B) workforce related programs; and
(C) state and federal programs.
(4) Require eligible workforce training programs to provide
data required under applicable federal workforce Pell grant
regulations, including:
(A) program completion rates;
(B) job placement rates; and
(C) graduate earnings.
(c) The department shall ensure that the implementation of this
section does not impose requirements more restrictive than, or
inconsistent with, any applicable federal rules governing the
workforce Pell grant program.
SECTION 5. An emergency is declared for this act.
SB 161—LS 6719/DI 143


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Education and Career
Development, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 161, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 1, line 10, delete "and" and insert "or".
Page 3, line 3, delete "December" and insert "January".
Page 3, line 12, delete "is eligible to" and insert "shall".
Page 3, delete lines 31 through 42.
Page 4, delete lines 1 through 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 5. IC 22-4.1-4-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) As used in this section,
"High skill, high wage, or in demand industry sectors or
occupations" means sectors or occupations identified by the state
pursuant to the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education
Act of 2006 (20 U.S.C. 2301 et seq.) and applicable state and local
workforce development processes.
(b) The department, in consultation with the commission for
higher education (established under IC 21-18-2-1) shall do the
following:
(1) Establish a process to identify and approve eligible
workforce training programs that prepare students for high
skill, high wage, or in demand industry sectors or occupations
for workforce Pell grants.
(2) Establish a process for institutions and programs to:
(A) apply for recognition as an eligible workforce training
program;
(B) be approved for workforce Pell grants; and
(C) appeal denials of workforce Pell grants.
(3) Coordinate certification and oversight of eligible
workforce training programs with:
(A) workforce focused agencies;
(B) workforce related programs; and
(C) state and federal programs.
(4) Require eligible workforce training programs to provide
data required under applicable federal workforce Pell grant
regulations, including:
(A) program completion rates;
(B) job placement rates; and
(C) graduate earnings.
SB 161—LS 6719/DI 143


(c) The department shall ensure that the implementation of this
section does not impose requirements more restrictive than, or
inconsistent with, any applicable federal rules governing the
workforce Pell grant program.".
Page 5, delete lines 1 through 26.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy.
(Reference is to SB 161 as introduced.)
RAATZ, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 3.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 161, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to SB 161 as printed January 16, 2026.)
HOLDMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 1
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 161 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 3, line 39, delete "The department," and insert "The governor
and the department,".
Page 3, line 42, delete "and approve".
(Reference is to SB 161 as printed January 21, 2026.)
RAATZ
SB 161—LS 6719/DI 143